Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-504
Year-round operation of public schools; conversion; procedure.

Any public school district in this state may convert any or all of the schools in the district to year-round operation under sections 79-503 to 79-505 upon an affirmative vote of at least seventy-five percent of the school board or board of education. The vote shall be taken at a public meeting of the board following a special public hearing called for the purpose of receiving testimony on such conversion. The board shall give at least seven calendar days' notice of the time, place, and purpose of such hearing and shall publish such notice at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the school district. Such schools shall meet all State Board of Education rules and regulations pertaining to accreditation.

Laws 1973, LB 65, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 348, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-201.02;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 257.